Hawaii statutes.
B. Voting

§414-141 Shareholders' list for meeting.
(a) After fixing a record date for a meeting, a corporation shall prepare an
alphabetical list of the names of all its shareholders who are entitled to
notice of a shareholders' meeting. The list shall be arranged by voting group
(and within each voting group by class or series of shares) and show the
address of and number of shares held by each shareholder.

(b) The shareholders' list shall be available
for inspection by any shareholder, beginning two business days after notice of
the meeting for which the list was prepared is given and continuing through the
meeting, at the corporation's principal office or at a place identified in the
meeting notice in the city where the meeting will be held, or on a reasonably
accessible electronic network; provided that the information required to gain
access to the shareholders' list is provided with the notice of the meeting. A
shareholder, the shareholder's agent, or the shareholder's attorney, shall be
entitled on written demand to inspect and to copy the list, during regular
business hours and at the shareholder's expense, during the period it is
available for inspection. If the corporation determines that the list will be
made available on an electronic network, the corporation shall take reasonable
steps to ensure that such information is available only to shareholders of the
corporation.

(c) The corporation shall make the
shareholders' list available at the meeting, and any shareholder, the
shareholder's agent, or shareholder's attorney, is entitled to inspect the list
at any time during the meeting or any adjournment.

(d) If the corporation refuses to allow a
shareholder, the shareholder's agent, or the shareholder's attorney, to inspect
the shareholders' list before or at the meeting (or copy the list as permitted
by subsection (b)), the circuit court, on application of the shareholder, may
summarily order the inspection or copying at the corporation's expense and may
postpone the meeting for which the list was prepared until the inspection or
copying is complete.

(e) Refusal or failure to prepare or make
available the shareholders' list does not affect the validity of action taken
at the meeting. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 129, §21; am L 2002, c
130, §20]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next